Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1182
Conference expenses; payment; when.

Any department, agency, commission, council, committee, or board of the state may pay conference expenses of persons who are not state employees if sufficient money is collected from such persons to cover the total expense incurred. No payment shall be made unless it is in accordance with the policies and procedures established by the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1987, LB 539, § 1.